Massachusetts, session 194th, S1837.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Sub-section 4 of section 28 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new
paragraph:
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Blackstone Valley
Regional Vocational Technical High School, the employees of which have become, or which
become members of the state employees retirement system under the provisions of this
subdivision or any other previous act, shall remit to the state board of retirement as the
employer's normal cost as determined by the actuary, of benefits earned during each year by such
employees who are members of the state employees' retirement system.
of 3

The actuary shall determine such cost as a percentage of the payroll of the Blackstone
Valley Regional Vocational Technical High School for such employees based upon the most
recent actuarial valuation of the state retirement system. The actuary may consider factors
including types of governmental unit, employee demographic information, and employee group
classification to help in the determination of said percentage. Said cost shall be paid monthly
and deposited in the pension reserve fund of the state employees' retirement system. The actuary
shall review the percentage determined in this paragraph at least every three years.
SECTION 2. Sub-section (4) of section 28 of chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:
(d) The state retirement board upon terms and conditions it may establish, may require a
participating employer governed by this sub-section, who fails to remit either its normal cost
amount as determined in paragraph (c), or the contributions made on behalf of employees who
are members of the Massachusetts State Employees Retirement System as required by section 22
of Chapter 32, by the first day of the second month following the work month, to pay an
additional amount equal to 10% of the total amount of delinquent contributions. The state
retirement board shall have the right to commence an action in contract for payment of
outstanding amounts determined to be due in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. Reimbursements currently outstanding to the state retirement board under
paragraph (b) of sub-section (4) of section 28 of chapter 32 for calendar years 2013, 2014, and
2015 shall not be required.
SECTION 4. Reimbursements currently outstanding to the state retirement board under
paragraph (c) of sub-section (4) of section 28 of chapter 32 for calendar years 2016, 2017 and
of 3

2018 shall be required and remitted under terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the
board.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
of 3